Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,106
Consumer credit transaction; default; notice required.

(1) With respect to a consumer credit transaction, after a consumer has been in default for ten days, a creditor may give the consumer the notice described in this section. A creditor gives notice to the consumer under this section when he or she delivers the notice to the consumer or delivers or mails the notice to the consumer's last-known residence address.

(2) The notice shall be in writing and shall conspicuously state: The name, address, and telephone number of the creditor to which payment is to be made; a brief identification of the credit transaction; the consumer's right to cure the default; and the amount of payment and date by which payment must be made to cure the default, or any other performance necessary to cure the default and the date by which such performance must be tendered.

Laws 1983, LB 111, § 2.